Utah statutes.
78B-2-224.   Disabilities -- Time tolled.

A statute of limitations may not be applied to a person's ability to bring an action during a period in which the person is:

(1)  a minor; or

(2)  mentally incompetent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

